Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF2103.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 289A.08, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Generally; individuals. (a) A taxpayer must file a return for each taxable year the taxpayer is required to file a return under section 6012 of the Internal Revenue Code or meets the requirements under paragraph (d) to file a return, except that: (1) an individual who is not a Minnesota resident for any part of the year is not required to file a Minnesota income tax return if the individual's gross income derived from Minnesota sources as determined under sections 290.081, paragraph (a), and 290.17, is less than the filing requirements for a single individual who is a full year resident of Minnesota; (2) an individual who is a Minnesota resident is not required to file a Minnesota income tax return if the individual's gross income derived from Minnesota sources as determined under section 290.17, less the subtractions allowed under section 290.0132, subdivisions 12 and 15, is less than the filing requirements for a single individual who is a full-year resident of Minnesota. (b) The decedent's final income tax return, and other income tax returns for prior years where the decedent had gross income in excess of the minimum amount at which an individual is required to file and did not file, must be filed by the decedent's personal representative, if any. If there is no personal representative, the return or returns must be filed by the transferees, as defined in section 270C.58, subdivision 3, who receive property of the decedent. (c) The term "gross income," as it is used in this section, has the same meaning given it in section 290.01, subdivision 20. (d) The commissioner of revenue must annually determine the gross income levels at which individuals are required to file a return for each taxable year based on the amounts allowed as a deduction under section 290.0123. deleted text begin (e) Notwithstanding paragraph (a), an individual must file a Minnesota income tax return for each taxable year that the taxpayer has made an election to receive advance payments of the child tax credit under section 290.0661, subdivision 8. deleted text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2024. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 290.0661, subdivision 9, is amended to read: Subd. 9. Minimum credit. (a) An eligible taxpayer is allowed the greater of the credit allowed under subdivision 2 or the minimum credit described in this subdivision. A taxpayer is eligible for the minimum credit under this subdivision ifdeleted text begin :deleted text end deleted text begin (1) the taxpayer received an advance payment of the credit under subdivision 8; and deleted text end deleted text begin (2)deleted text end the combined amount of the taxpayer's credits under subdivision 2 and section 290.0671, after the phaseout in subdivision 4, is greater than $0. (b) The credit allowed under this subdivision is equal to 50 percent of the credit received under subdivision 2 in the prior taxable year, unless paragraph (c) applies. (c) If a taxpayer is claiming fewer qualifying children in the current taxable year than in the prior taxable year, the minimum credit allowed under this subdivision is equal to 50 percent of credit received under this section in the prior taxable year multiplied by a fraction in which: (1) the numerator is the number of qualifying children in the current taxable year; and (2) the denominator is the number of qualifying children in the prior taxable year. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2024. new text end Sec. 3. new text begin REPEALER.new text end new text begin Minnesota Statutes 2024, sections 290.0661, subdivisions 6 and 8; and 290.0671, subdivision 4, new text end new text begin are repealed. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2024. new text end APPENDIX Repealed Minnesota Statutes: 25-04203 290.0661 MINNESOTA CHILD TAX CREDIT. Subd. 6. Credit refundable; appropriation. If the amount of credit which the claimant is eligible to receive under this section exceeds the claimant's tax liability under this chapter, the commissioner shall refund the excess to the claimant. An amount sufficient to pay the refunds required by this section is appropriated to the commissioner from the general fund. Subd. 8. Advance payment of credits. (a) The commissioner of revenue must establish a process to allow taxpayers to elect to receive one or more advance payments of the credit under this section. The amount of advance payments must be based on the taxpayer and commissioner's estimate of the amount of credits for which the taxpayer would be eligible in the taxable year beginning in the calendar year in which the payments were made. The commissioner must not distribute advance payments to a taxpayer who does not elect to receive advance payments. (b) The amount of a taxpayer's credit under this section for the taxable year is reduced by the amount of advance payments received by the taxpayer in the calendar year during which the taxable year began. If a taxpayer's advance payments exceeded the credit the taxpayer was eligible to receive for the taxable year, the taxpayer's liability for tax is increased by the difference between the amount of advance payments received and the credit amount. 290.0671 MINNESOTA WORKING FAMILY CREDIT. Subd. 4. Credit refundable. If the amount of credit which the claimant is eligible to receive under this section exceeds the claimant's tax liability under this chapter, the commissioner shall refund the excess to the claimant.